Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.230

Exceptions to challenges—Determination.

The challenge may be excepted to by the adverse party for insufficiency, and if so, the court shall determine the sufficiency thereof, assuming the facts alleged therein to be true. The challenge may be denied by the adverse party, and if so, the court shall determine the facts and decide the issue.

[ 2003 c 406 s 11; Code 1881 s 217; 1877 p 45 s 221; 1869 p 53 s 221; RRS s 335.]